Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 177.24, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Amount. (a) Except as otherwise provided in sections 177.21 to 177.35, every employer must pay each employee wages at a rate of at least: (1) deleted text begin $8.00deleted text end new text begin $15.00new text end per hour beginning August 1, deleted text begin 2014deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end ; (2) deleted text begin $9.00deleted text end new text begin $16.25new text end per hour beginning August 1, deleted text begin 2015deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end ; (3) deleted text begin $9.50deleted text end new text begin $17.50new text end per hour beginning August 1, deleted text begin 2016deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) $18.75 per hour beginning August 1, 2028; new text end new text begin (5) $20.00 per hour beginning August 1, 2029; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end the rate established under paragraph (c) beginning January 1, deleted text begin 2018deleted text end new text begin 2030new text end . (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), during the first 90 consecutive days of employment, an employer may pay an employee under the age of 20 years a wage of at least: (1) deleted text begin $6.50deleted text end new text begin $13.00new text end per hour beginning August 1, deleted text begin 2014deleted text end new text begin 2025new text end ; (2) deleted text begin $7.25deleted text end new text begin $14.25new text end per hour beginning August 1, deleted text begin 2015deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end ; (3) deleted text begin $7.75deleted text end new text begin $15.50new text end per hour beginning August 1, deleted text begin 2016deleted text end new text begin 2027new text end ; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) $16.75 per hour beginning August 1, 2028; new text end new text begin (5) $18.00 per hour beginning August 1, 2029; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end the rate established under paragraph (c) beginning January 1, deleted text begin 2018deleted text end new text begin 2030new text end . No employer may take any action to displace an employee, including a partial displacement through a reduction in hours, wages, or employment benefits, in order to hire an employee at the wage authorized in this paragraph. (c) No later than August 31 of each year, the commissioner shall determine the percentage increase in the rate of inflation, as measured by the implicit price deflator, national data for personal consumption expenditures as determined by the United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis during the 12-month period immediately preceding that August or, if that data is unavailable, during the most recent 12-month period for which data is available. The minimum wage rates in paragraphs (a) and (b) are increased by the lesser of: (1) five percent, rounded to the nearest cent; or (2) the percentage calculated by the commissioner, rounded to the nearest cent. A minimum wage rate shall not be reduced under this paragraph. The new minimum wage rates determined under this paragraph take effect on the next January 1.